New York, session 2025-2026, S9254.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 392 of the education law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 3 (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, (1) on and after 4 April first, two thousand twenty-six, for any electing employee who is 5 subject to paragraph (d) of this subdivision, the state shall contribute 6 an additional one percent of the employee contribution pursuant to the 7 provisions of this section on behalf of such employee; and (2) on and 8 after April first, two thousand twenty-seven, for any electing employee 9 who is subject to paragraph (d) of this subdivision, the state shall 10 contribute an additional one percent of the employee contribution pursu- 11 ant to the provisions of this section on behalf of such employee; and 12 (3) on and after April first, two thousand twenty-eight, for any elect- 13 ing employee who is subject to paragraph (d) of this subdivision, the 14 state shall contribute an additional one percent of the employee 15 contribution pursuant to the provisions of this section on behalf of 16 such employee. 17 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 6252 of the education law is amended by 18 adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 19 (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, (1) on and after 20 April first, two thousand twenty-six, for any electing employee who is 21 subject to paragraph (d) of this subdivision, the state shall contribute 22 an additional one percent of the employee contribution pursuant to the 23 provisions of this section on behalf of such employee; and (2) on and 24 after April first, two thousand twenty-seven, for any electing employee 25 who is subject to paragraph (d) of this subdivision, the state shall 26 contribute an additional one percent of the employee contribution pursu- 27 ant to the provisions of this section on behalf of such employee; and 28 (3) on and after April first, two thousand twenty-eight, for any elect- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14698-01-6 S. 9254 2 1 ing employee who is subject to paragraph (d) of this subdivision, the 2 state shall contribute an additional one percent of the employee 3 contribution pursuant to the provisions of this section on behalf of 4 such employee. 5 § 3. The contribution provided for in sections one and two of this act 6 by the state and city of New York shall be provided outside the operat- 7 ing budget of the city university of New York from the state fringe 8 benefit fund and the New York city pension budget for the senior and 9 community colleges, respectively. 10 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.